test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_4st_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    aimâkkâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aimâkkâšâm
    alanâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: alanâd
    aldadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aldadâlâm
    almottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almottâđâm
    anadâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anadâđâm
    anattâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anattâđâm
    arvâlâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: arvâlâdâm
    askadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: askadâlâm
    aštiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aštiidâđâm
    aštiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aštiidât
    cakkârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cakkârâšâm
    cakkârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cakkârâš
    ciähudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciähudâđâm
    cogâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cogâdâđâm
    cojâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cojâdâđâm
    cojâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cojâdât
    cummâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cummâluuvčâm
    cummâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cummâlâhš
    cummâlâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cummâlâšâm
    cáhádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cáhádâđâm
    cáhádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cáhádât
    cápcudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cápcudâđâđ
    edirvâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: edirvâšâm
    emedâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: emedâšâm
    falskiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falskiittâđâm
    falâluššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falâluuvčâm
    fattiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fattiittâđâm
    faškastâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: faškastâđâm
    faškâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faškâsâd
    filliittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: filliittât
    fáškudâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fáškudâlâm
    haddadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haddadâlâm
    hapârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hapârâšâm
    haterâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haterâšâm
    hepânâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hepânâšâm
    hevâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hevâttâđâm
    hevâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hevâttât
    hilgottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilgottâđâm
    huhkádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huhkádâlâm
    hundâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hundârušâm
    huškottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huškottâđâm
    hámsutâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hámsuttâđâm
    hámárdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hámárdâlâm
    háputtâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háputtâšâm
    hárávâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárávâšâm
    hárččulâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárččuluuvčâm
    hárččulâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hárččulâhš
    hástálâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hástálâd
    hávdádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hávdádâlâm
    ilbâdâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ilbâdâšâm
    imâštâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: imâštât
    iäljáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäljárušâm
    iäljárâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäljárâšâm
    iäpádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäpádâlâm
    iätáduddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iätádudâm
    išedâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: išedâšâm
    ištâmâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ištâmâšâm
    išádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: išádâlâm
    jurgâlâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurgâlâđâm
    jurmâgâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurmâgâd
    jurmâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurmâsâd
    jyevdivâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jyevdivâšâm
    jámálgâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jámálgâd
    kaivâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaivâsâdâm
    kamâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kamâdâđâm
    kastâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kastâdâđâm
    kavnâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavnâttâđâm
    kavnâđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kavnâđât
    kađvâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kađvâdâđâm
    kerivuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kerivušâm
    kerivâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kerivâšâm
    kesijâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kesijâšâm
    kevâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kevâttâđâm
    kiemârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiemârdâlâm
    kietâdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kietâdâlâm
    kieđâvuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kieđâvušâm
    kiäldádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäldádâđâm
    kiäsádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsádâđâm
    kiäsáđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsáđâđâm
    kiäčádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäčádâlâm
    kiškodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiškodât
    kobdánâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kobdánâd
    kohádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kohádâđâm
    kohádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kohádât
    koijâdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koijâdâlâm
    kokkâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kokkâsâdâm
    kompâlâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kompâlâšâm
    komárdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: komárdâlâm
    kopsettâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kopsettâđâm
    korppâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korppâsâdâm
    korrâdâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korrâdâšâm
    kuldâlâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuldâlâdâm
    kuođâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuođâttâđâm
    kuáivudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáivudâđâm
    kuškiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuškiidâđâm
    kuškâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuškâdâđâm
    kákkásâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kákkásâd
    kákkásâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kákkásâđâm
    kámppádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kámppádâlâm
    kárvudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kárvudâđâm
    käskittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: käskittâđâm
    kävilâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kävilâšâm
    laitâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laitâččâđâm
    lapâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lapâččâđâm
    leggistâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leggistât
    leirâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leirâdâđâm
    litodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: litodâđâm
    liävuttuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liävuttudâm
    loigânâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loigânâd
    lopedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lopedâđâm
    luhâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luhâluuvčâm
    luhâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luhâluš
    luoddânâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luoddânâd
    luáštádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luáštádâđâm
    láittádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: láittádâđâm
    majettuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: majettudâm
    manâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: manâttât
    markkânâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: markkânâšâm
    muggâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muggârušâm
    muijâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muijâsâdâm
    mulâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mulâdâđâm
    mulâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mulâdâđáin
    murdelâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: murdelâđâm
    mášuttuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mášuttudâm
    mášuttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mášuttâđâm
    nahettâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nahettâđâm
    napâlâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: napâlâšâm
    nimmâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nimmârušâm
    niälgáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niälgárušâm
    njolccâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njolccâdâđâm
    njuođâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuođâdâđâm
    njuáludâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuáludât
    noccedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noccedâđâm
    nuolttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolttâđâm
    nuolâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolâdâđâm
    nurdâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurdâdâđâm
    nurvodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurvodâđâm
    nurvottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurvottâđâm
    nurâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurâdâđâm
    nággáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nággárušâm
    oggârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oggârâšâm
    oskeldâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oskeldâđâm
    otânâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: otânâšâm
    oŋâttuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oŋâttušâm
    oŋâttâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oŋâttâšâm
    pajadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pajadâlâm
    patârâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: patârâd
    pačâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačâluuvčâm
    pačâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pačâlâhš
    peittâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peittâdâđâm
    peittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peittâđâm
    pelhittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pelhittâđâm
    petittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: petittât
    pevviruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pevvirušâm
    pirundâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pirundâlâm
    pismárâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pismárâšâm
    pivâstuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pivâstudâm
    pokkiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pokkiidâdâm
    pokkiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pokkiidâđâm
    porfâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: porfâsâdâm
    posolâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posoluuvčâm
    posolâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posolâhš
    posâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posâdâđâm
    posâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posâdât
    posâlâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posâlâd
    posâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posâlââvčâm
    posâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posâlâhš
    pozzelâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pozzelâdâm
    puhhiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puhhiidâđâm
    puiheldâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puiheldâđâm
    punccâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punccârušâm
    punjâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punjâdâđâm
    punjâlâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punjâlâđâm
    puárádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puárádâlâm
    puáránâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáránâdâm
    pyeredâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pyeredâđâm
    párudâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: párudâl
    páránâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páránâšâm
    päjittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: päjittâđâm
    ramâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ramâččâdâm
    ramâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ramâččâđâm
    rantustâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rantustâšâm
    rantustâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rantustâš
    rapettâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rapettâšâm
    renccidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: renccidât
    repčidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: repčidâđâm
    riggodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riggodâdâm
    riggodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riggodât
    riäčásâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riäčásâd
    ronedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ronedât
    rošáidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rošáidâđâm
    rudodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rudodâđâm
    ruhâdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruhâdâlâm
    ruohâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruohâdât
    ruovâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruovâdât
    ruttiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruttiidâđâm
    ruáhásâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáhásâdâm
    ruáinudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáinudâđâm
    ruákášâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruákášâđâm
    ráhtádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráhtádâđâm
    ráđádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráđádâlâm
    rävdijâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rävdijâšâm
    seđŋiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: seđŋiittâđâm
    sihodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sihodâđâm
    sivnádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sivnádâlâm
    skilottuddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skilottudâm
    skippuudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skippuudâđâm
    skirvânâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skirvânâd
    skiäŋkudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiäŋkudâđâm
    skovorâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skovorâšâm
    skođeruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skođerušâm
    skyenidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skyenidâđâm
    skájuttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skájuttâđâm
    sovodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sovodâđâm
    sovodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sovodât
    spassiibâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spassiibâšâm
    spiddáádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spiddáádât
    stapârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stapârâšâm
    suogârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suogârdâlâm
    surâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: surâdât
    sánádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sánádâlâm
    sávrudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sávrudâđâm
    taaidârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taaidârâšâm
    tappiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tappiittâđâm
    teddilâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teddilât
    tiäddálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäddáluuvčâm
    tiäddálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiäddálâhš
    tiälláádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiälláádâđâm
    tiälláádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiälláádât
    tohâluddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tohâludâm
    tolliidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tolliidâđâm
    tovâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâdâđâm
    tubdâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tubdâttâđâm
    tubákkâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tubákkâšâm
    tuommiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuommiittâđâm
    tuopânjâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuopânjâšâm
    turedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: turedâđâm
    tuáhtáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuáhtárušâm
    tuájáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuájárušâm
    tuápudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuápudât
    tuávidâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuávidâšâm
    ucástâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ucástâđâm
    uigâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uigâdâđâm
    usâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: usâdât
    vaigârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaigârdâlâm
    vajâgâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vajâgâšâm
    vajâgâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vajâgâš
    večiruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: večirušâm
    vieggâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vieggâsâdâm
    vigâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vigâdâđâm
    visârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: visârdâlâm
    viälgádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viälgádâđâm
    viälgádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viälgádât
    viärdádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viärdádâlâm
    viärmádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viärmádâđâm
    viššâluššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viššâlušâm
    vuojâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuojâdâđâm
    vuoškânjuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoškânjušâm
    vuáisádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáisádât
    vuájudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuájudâđâm
    vájugâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vájugâšâm
    vájugâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vájugâš
    váruttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: váruttâđâm
    vázzálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vázzáluuvčâm
    vázzálâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vázzáluš
    ájánâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ájánâd
    ánhástuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ánhástušâm
    árvuttuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: árvuttušâm
    árvuttâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: árvuttâšâm
    äŋgiruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: äŋgirušâm
    äŋgirâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: äŋgirâšâm
    šalligâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šalligâšâm
    čalâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čalâččâđâm
    čievčâstâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čievčâstâđâm
    čievčâstâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievčâstât
    čievčâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievčâttât
    čiähádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiähádâđâm
    čiŋâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiŋâdâđâm
    čiŋâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiŋâdât
    šnikkáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šnikkárušâm
    čonâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čonâdâđâm
    čonâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čonâdât
    čonâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čonâttâđâm
    čulgâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čulgâdâđâm
    čulgâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čulgâdât
    čuolâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolâdâđâm
    čuolâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolâttâđâm
